California statutes. Vehicle Code
(5) A vehicle impounded under paragraph (1) shall be released to the registered owner of the vehicle only upon presentation of evidence of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16020, for that vehicle, and evidence that all towing and storage fees related to the seizure of the vehicle are paid.

This paragraph does not apply to a person, entity, or agency who is entitled to release of a vehicle under paragraph (2) or (4) and is either:

(A) The registered and the legal owner and is described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(B) The registered owner or legal owner and is described in paragraph (4).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that fines collected pursuant to this section be used to reduce the number of uninsured drivers and not be used to generate revenue for general purposes.

(e) (1) Except as provided in this subdivision, the court shall impose a fine that is greater than the minimum fine specified in subdivision (a) or (b), and may not reduce that fine to the minimum specified fine authorized under those provisions, unless the defendant has presented the court with evidence of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16020, for the vehicle. In no event may the court impose a fine that is less than the minimum specified in subdivision (a) or (b), or impose a fine that exceeds the maximum specified fine authorized under those subdivisions. In addition to the fine authorized under subdivision (a) or (b), the court may issue an order directing the defendant to maintain insurance coverage satisfying the financial responsibility laws for at least one year from the date of the order.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the imposition of the fine required under subdivision (a) or (b) is mandatory upon conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 16028 and may not be waived, suspended, or reduced below the minimum fines, unless the court in its discretion reduces or waives the fine based on the defendant’s ability to pay. The court may direct that the fine and penalty assessments be paid within a limited time or in installments on specified dates. The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of justice that the minimum fines set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) for these offenses be enforced by the court, as provided in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16030.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial responsibility (1) when requested by a peace officer pursuant to Section 16028 or (2) to the clerk of the court as permitted by subdivision (e) of Section 16028, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, certificate of self-insurance, or assignment of deposit letter, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Upon receipt of the court’s abstract of conviction, the department shall suspend the driving privilege, effective upon the date of conviction, for a period of one year. The court shall impose an interim suspension of the person’s driving privileges pursuant to Section 13550, and shall notify the driver of the suspension pursuant to Section 13106, and all driver’s licenses in the possession of the driver shall be surrendered to the court pursuant to Section 13550. Any driver’s license surrendered to the court pursuant to this section shall be transmitted by the court, together with the required report of the conviction, to the department within 10 days of the conviction. The suspension may not be terminated until one year has elapsed from the date of the suspension and until the person files proof of financial responsibility, as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430) except that the suspension shall be reinstated if the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility for three years.

(b) However, in lieu of suspending a person’s driving privileges pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall restrict the person’s driving privileges to driving that is required in the person’s course of employment, if driving of a motor vehicle is necessary in order to perform the duties of the person’s primary employment. The restriction shall remain in effect for the period of suspension otherwise required by subdivision (a). The court shall provide for endorsement of the restriction on the person’s driver’s license, and violation of the restriction constitutes a violation of Section 14603 and grounds for suspension or revocation of the license under Section 13360.

(c) This section does not apply to a driver who is driving a motor vehicle owned or leased by the employer of the driver and driven in the course of the driver’s employment with the permission of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16033.

No public entity or employee, agent, or any person or organization authorized under Section 4610 to endorse receipts or validate registration cards or potential registration cards, is liable for any loss, detriment, or injury resulting, directly or indirectly, from any of the following:

(a) Failure to request evidence of financial responsibility.

(b) Failure to notify a vehicle owner that an insurance policy has been terminated.

(c) The discretionary failure to cancel, suspend, or revoke a vehicle registration when an insurance policy has been terminated.

(d) Inaccurately recording that evidence under Section 16028 or as a result of the driver producing false or inaccurate financial responsibility information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Evidence of Financial Responsibility [16050. - 16058.1.]

16050.

In order to establish evidence of financial responsibility, every driver or employer involved in an accident and required to report the accident under Section 16000 shall establish to the satisfaction of the department that the provisions of this article are applicable to his or her responsibilities arising out of the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16050.5.

The owner of a vehicle, who has a liability insurance policy with respect to the vehicle, shall, upon request, furnish insurance information to a person who, while operating the vehicle with the owner’s permission, is involved in a reportable accident with the insured vehicle, or to the department whenever the department is required to establish whether the permitted driver meets the financial responsibility requirements of Section 16020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1177, Sec. 4.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16051.

(a) Evidence may be established by filing a report indicating that the motor vehicle involved in the accident was owned, rented, or leased by or under the direction of the United States, this state, or any political subdivision of this state or municipality thereof.

(b) Evidence may be established by filing a report indicating that the motor vehicle involved in the accident was owned and operated by a peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter in the performance of his or her duty, and at the request of or under the direction of the United States, this state, or any political subdivision or municipality of this
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 823, Sec. 4.   (AB 2298)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16052.

Evidence may be established if the owner of the motor vehicle involved in the accident was a self-insurer. Any person in whose name more than 25 motor vehicles are registered may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16053.

(a) The department may in its discretion, upon application, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that the applicant in whose name more than 25 motor vehicles are registered is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay judgments obtained against him or her in amounts at least equal to the amounts provided in Section 16056. The certificate may be issued authorizing the applicant to act as a self-insurer for either property damage or bodily injury or both. Any person duly qualified under the laws or ordinances of any city or county to act as self-insurer and then acting as such, may upon filing with the department satisfactory evidence thereof, along with the application as may be required by the department, be entitled to receive a certificate of self-insurance. 

(b) Upon not less than five days’ notice and a hearing pursuant to the notice, the department may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within 30 days after the judgment has become final and has not been stayed or satisfied shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1177, Sec. 5.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16054.

(a) Evidence may be established by filing with the department satisfactory documentation:

(1) That the owner had an automobile liability policy, a motor vehicle liability policy, or bond in effect at the time of the accident with respect to the driver or the motor vehicle involved in the accident, unless it is established that at the time of the accident the motor vehicle was being operated without the owner’s permission, express or implied, or was parked by a driver who had been operating the vehicle without permission.

(2) That the driver of the motor vehicle involved in the accident, if he or she was not the owner of the motor vehicle, had in effect at the time of the accident an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to his or her operation of the motor vehicle not owned by him or her.

(3) That the liability as may arise from the driver’s operation of the motor vehicle involved in the accident is, in the judgment of the department, covered by some form of liability insurance or bond.

(4) That the owner or driver, if he or she is involved in an accident while operating a vehicle of less than four wheels, had in effect at the time of the accident with respect to the driver or vehicle a liability policy or bond that meets the requirements of Section 16056.

(b) Any automobile liability policy or bond referred to in this section shall comply with the requirements of Section 16056 and Sections 11580, 11580.011, 11580.1, and 11580.2 of the Insurance Code, but need not contain provisions other than those required by those sections, and shall not be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16054.2.

Evidence may also be established by any of the following:

(a) By depositing with the department cash in the amount specified in Section 16056. 

(b) By providing documentation of a liability policy covering the operation of the vehicle that (A) is issued by a charitable risk pool operating under Section 5005.1 of the Corporations Code, if the registered owner of the vehicle is a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the United States Internal Revenue Code and (B) the policy is subject, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to that limit for one person, to a limit of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and, if the accident has resulted in injury to, or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

(c) By any other manner authorized by the department which effectuates the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16055.

Evidence of insurance or bond shall be submitted by the insurer or surety in conformance with the requirements of Section 16057. In the event of notice to the department by the company that issued one of the above stated policies or bonds that coverage was not in effect, then the policy or bond shall not operate to establish evidence as provided for by Section 16054.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16056.

(a) A policy or bond shall not be effective under Section 16054 unless issued by an insurance company or surety company admitted to do business in this state by the Insurance Commissioner, except as provided in subdivision (b), and unless the policy or bond is subject to either of the following:

(1) If the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to that limit for one person, to a limit of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons
 in any one accident, and, if the accident has resulted in injury to, or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for any policy or bond issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to that limit for one person, to a limit of not less than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and, if the accident has resulted in injury to, or destruction of property, to a limit of not less
 than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

(b) A policy or bond shall not be effective under Section 16054 with respect to any vehicle that was not registered in this state or was a vehicle that was registered elsewhere than in this state at the effective date of the policy or bond or the most recent renewal thereof, unless the insurance company or surety company issuing the policy or bond is admitted to do business in this state, or if the company is not admitted to do business in this state, unless it executes a power of attorney authorizing the department to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action upon the
 policy or bond arising out of an accident mentioned in subdivision (a).

(c) Any nonresident driver whose driving privilege has been suspended or revoked based upon an action that requires proof of financial responsibility may, in lieu of providing a certificate of insurance from a company admitted to do business in California, provide a written certificate of proof of financial responsibility that is satisfactory to the department, covers the operation of a vehicle in this state, meets the liability requirements of this section, and is from a company that is admitted to do business in that person’s state of residence.

(d) For a policy or bond issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2035, the minimum liability coverage shall be increased by twenty thousand
 dollars ($20,000) for bodily injury or death for one person, by forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for bodily injury or death for all persons, and by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for property damage.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 19.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16056.1.

Notwithstanding the coverage limits specified in Section 16056, an automobile insurance policy described in Section 11629.71 of the Insurance Code shall be effective under Section 16054 when issued by an insurance company admitted to do business in this state by the Insurance Commissioner and the policy is subject, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to that limit for one person, to a limit of not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and if the accident has resulted in injury to, or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 435, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16057.

Upon receipt of notice of an accident from the department, the insurance company or surety company named in the notice shall notify the department within such time and in such manner as the department may require whenever the policy or bond was not in effect at the time of the accident.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

16058.

(a) (1) An insurer that issues private passenger automobile liability insurance policies and coverages, or private passenger automobile policies and coverages issued by an automobile assigned risk plan, as those policies, coverages, and plans are described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4000.37 shall electronically report to the department liability insurance information under subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(2) On or before January 1, 2023, an insurer that issues commercial and fleet insurance policies shall electronically report to the department liability insurance information under subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(b) (1) An insurer shall report all existing motor vehicle liability insurance policies or coverages described in subdivision (a) issued for vehicles registered in this state or to policyholders with a
 California address, to the department in a manner that preserves existing reporting relationships and that allows for smaller insurers and those with unusual circumstances to be accommodated, consistent with the intent of this section.

(2) Consistent with the intent of this section, a small insurer or those with unusual circumstances may be accommodated by, among other methods, an extension of the mandatory electronic reporting deadline set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision(a) to no later than July 1, 2023.

(c) An
 insurer shall electronically report to the department all issued motor vehicle liability policies or coverages, as described in subdivision (a), within 30 days of the effective date of the coverage.

(d) An insurer shall electronically report to the department the termination of a reported policy or any change of information previously reported under subdivision (b) or (c), as specified by the department, within 45 days of the date of termination or change. This report shall include the effective date of the termination, amendment, or cancellation and any other information that does not exceed that required under subdivision (c).

(e) (1) Those persons with alternative forms of financial responsibility pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 16021 shall provide satisfactory evidence of that responsibility as determined by the department.

(2) In addition, the department shall establish an alternative procedure for establishment of satisfactory evidence of financial responsibility to permit the timely renewal of vehicle registration when the electronic data has not been updated due to circumstances beyond the vehicle owner’s immediate control. Those circumstances may include, but are not limited to, a vehicle identification error in either the department’s or the insurer’s records or insurance purchased too recently to have been electronically transmitted to the department. Whenever this alternative procedure is used, the department shall, subsequent to the issuance of the registration certificate and indicia, contact the
 insurer to obtain electronic data pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) The department shall adopt regulations for reporting insurance information, including, but not limited to, establishing acceptable timeframes and approved methods for reporting information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 10.   (AB 174)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16058.1.

The department shall develop a method by which law enforcement officers and court personnel, on and after July 1, 2006, may electronically verify that an insurance policy or bond for a motor vehicle has been issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 706, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Suspensions [16070. - 16078.]

16070.

(a) Whenever a driver involved in an accident described in Section 16000 fails to provide evidence of financial responsibility, as required by Section 16020, at the time of the accident, the department shall, pursuant to subdivision (b), suspend the privilege of the driver or owner to drive a motor vehicle, including the driving privilege of a nonresident in this state.

(b) Whenever the department receives an accident report pursuant to this article that alleges that any of the drivers involved in the accident was not in compliance with Section 16020 at the time of the accident, the department shall immediately mail to that driver a notice of intent to suspend the driving privilege of that driver. The department shall suspend the driving privilege 30 days after mailing the notice, unless the driver has, prior to that date, established evidence of financial responsibility at the time of the accident, as specified in Section 16021, with the department. The suspension notice shall notify the driver of the action taken and the right to a hearing under Section 16075.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16071.

The department shall suspend the driving privilege of any person upon receiving notice from another state that the person’s driving privilege in that state has been suspended for failure to meet the financial responsibility provisions of the law in that state, if the suspension in that state was taken on grounds that would have resulted in a suspension in this state.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1126, Sec. 12) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16072.

(a) The suspension of the driving privilege of a person as provided in Section 16070 shall not be terminated until one year has elapsed from the date of actual commencement of the suspension and until the person files proof of financial responsibility as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430), except that the suspension shall be reinstated if the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility for three years. However, in lieu of suspending a person’s driving privilege pursuant to this section, the department, upon application, if the person files and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility as provided in this section and pays a penalty fee to the department of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), may restrict the person’s driving privilege to any of the following situations:

(1) Necessary travel to and from that person’s place of employment.

(2) Driving that is required in the person’s course of employment, when driving a motor vehicle is necessary in order to perform the duties of the person’s primary employment.

(3) Necessary travel to transport a minor dependent in that person’s immediate family to and from an institute of primary or secondary instruction, if the chief administrative officer or principal of the educational institution certifies in writing to the department that the minor dependent is enrolled in the educational institution and no form of public transportation or schoolbus is available between the applicant’s place of residence and the educational institution.

The restriction shall remain in effect for the period of suspension required by this section, so long as proof of financial responsibility is maintained.

(b) If a suspension has been imposed under Section 16070 and one year has elapsed from the date the suspension actually commenced, that suspension shall be terminated if the driving privilege is suspended under Section 16370 or 16381 as the result of a judgment arising out of the accident for which proof of financial responsibility was required to be established. The department may reimpose the suspension of the driving privilege of a person under Section 16070 if the suspension under Section 16370 or 16381 is later set aside for a reason other than that the person has satisfied the judgment in full or to the extent provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16250) and has given proof of ability to respond in damages as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430).

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 42200) of Division 18, all revenues derived from the penalty fees provided in subdivision (a) shall, after deduction by the department of the costs incurred by the department in administering this section, be deposited in the Financial Responsibility Penalty Account in the General Fund. The balance in this fund on each July 1, which is not subject to appropriation as provided in Section 12980 of the Insurance Code, shall revert to the General Fund.

(d) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a commercial driver’s license holder.

(2) A commercial driver’s license holder whose driving privilege is otherwise suspended under this chapter is not entitled to a restricted license, unless that person surrenders his or her commercial driver’s license and is issued a noncommercial class C or M driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16073.

(a) The privilege of a person employed for the purpose of driving a motor vehicle for compensation whose occupation requires the use of a motor vehicle in the course of his or her employment to drive a motor vehicle not registered in his or her name and in the course of that person’s employment may not be suspended under this chapter even though his or her privilege to drive is otherwise suspended under this chapter.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a commercial driver’s licenseholder. A commercial driver’s licenseholder whose driving privilege is otherwise suspended under this chapter may not operate a commercial motor vehicle.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (c).)
-------------------------------------------

16074.

Whenever the department has taken any action or has failed to take any action under this chapter by reason of having received erroneous information, or by reason of having received no information, it shall take appropriate action to carry out the purposes and effect of this chapter upon receiving correct information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

16075.

(a) The suspension provisions of this article shall not apply to a driver or owner until 30 days after the department sends to the driver or owner notice of its intent to suspend his or her driving privilege, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16070, and advises the driver or owner of his or her right to a hearing as provided in this section.

(b) If the driver or owner receiving the notice of intent to suspend wishes to have a hearing, the request for a hearing shall be made in writing to the department within 10 days of the receipt of the notice. Failure to respond to a notice of intent within 10 days of receipt of the notice is a waiver of the person’s right to a hearing.

(c) If the driver or owner makes a timely request for a hearing, the department shall hold the hearing before the effective date of the suspension to determine the applicability of this chapter to the driver or owner, including a determination of whether:

(1) The accident has resulted in property damage in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or bodily injury, or death.

(2) The driver or owner has established evidence of financial responsibility, as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 16050), that was in effect at the time of the accident.

(d) A request for a hearing does not stay the suspension of a person’s driving privilege. However, if the department does not conduct a hearing and make a determination pursuant thereto within the time
 limit provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16070, the department shall stay the effective date of the order of suspension pending a determination.

(e) The hearing provided for by this section shall be held in the county of residence of the person requesting the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3 of Division 6.

(f) The department shall render its decision within 15 days after conclusion of the hearing.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 34) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 35.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16076.

(a) The department shall notify every person whose driving privilege is suspended, pursuant to Section 16070, of that person’s right to apply for a restricted driving privilege authorized under Section 16072.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the department shall prepare and publish a printed summary. The printed summary may contain, but is not limited to, the following wording:
“If your driving privilege is suspended due to involvement in an accident while you were uninsured, you may apply for a restricted license at any office of the Department of Motor Vehicles, accompanied with proof of financial responsibility, payment of a penalty fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and, unless already paid, payment of a reissuance fee.The Mello-McAlister Restricted Employment Driving Privilege Act allows you to apply for a driver’s license limiting you to driving to and from work, and during the course of your primary employment, during the one-year mandatory term of suspension. The restricted license will not be issued if any other suspension or revocation action has been taken against your driving privilege.”(c) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Mello-McAlister Restricted Employment Driving Privilege Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16077.

(a) The department, upon application and payment of a fifty dollar ($50) fee and a penalty fee of two hundred dollars ($200), may issue a restricted license to an applicant with serious health problems, or to an applicant with an immediate family member with serious health problems, when the applicant’s privilege to drive is otherwise suspended under this chapter. The restricted license may be issued to enable the applicant to drive a motor vehicle for the purpose of receiving medical or mental health treatments of a prolonged and repetitive nature for the applicant or the member of the applicant’s immediate family with serious health problems, if the applicant files and maintains proof of financial responsibility on file with the department pursuant to Section 16021 and there is no other suitable means of transportation available.

(b) The application shall set forth the nature of the health problem, the nature of the treatments, the duration and location of the treatments, and the schedule for visits. The applicant shall submit documentation signed by the treating physician and surgeon or licensed psychotherapist, as defined in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (e) of Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, as necessary to assist the department in its decision to grant or deny the restricted license. Upon reviewing the application, the department may determine that an investigation as to the person’s fitness to operate a motor vehicle is warranted. If the department makes this determination, the department may conduct an investigation in a manner provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 6.

(c) In reviewing the application, the department shall give due consideration to the circumstances set forth in the application and shall be guided by principles of fairness and humanity.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 42200) of Division 18, all revenues derived from the penalty fees provided in subdivision (a) shall, after deduction by the department of the costs incurred by the department in administering this section, be deposited in the Financial Responsibility Penalty Account in the General Fund.

(e) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a commercial driver’s license holder.

(2) A commercial driver’s license holder whose driving privilege is otherwise suspended under this chapter is not entitled to a restricted license unless that person surrenders his or her commercial driver’s license and is issued a noncommercial class C or M driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16078.

Any person who has paid the penalty fee prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 16072, whether or not the person has received the license restriction authorized by that section, may also apply for and receive a restricted license under Section 16077 without paying the fees prescribed in Section 16077. Any person who has paid the fees prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 16077, whether or not the person has received the restricted license authorized by that section, may also apply for and receive the license restriction prescribed in Section 16072.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1407, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Suspensions Following Unsatisfied Judgments [16250. - 16381.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [16250. - 16251.]

16250.

As used in this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430), “judgment” means a final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction in this or any other state or of the United States against a person as defendant upon a cause of action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

16251.

(a) As used in this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430), “cause of action” means any cause of action for damage to property in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or for damage in any amount on account of bodily injury to or death of any person resulting from the operation by the defendant or any other person of any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state, except a cause of action based upon statutory liability by reason of signing the application of a minor for a driver’s license.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 36) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 37.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suspension of Driving Privilege [16370. - 16381.]

16370.

The department shall suspend the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle upon receiving a certified copy of a judgment, or a certified copy of the register of actions (or a comparable court record of another jurisdiction) in an action resulting in a judgment for damages, and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment, on a form provided by the department, indicating that the person has failed for a period of 30 days to satisfy a judgment rendered against him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16370.5.

The department shall suspend the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle as specified in Section 116.880 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Except as provided in this section, an action brought under Section 116.880 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16250) of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16370.7.

Documents filed with the department pursuant to Section 16370 shall be accompanied by a fee of not to exceed twenty dollars ($20) to pay for processing the documents and issuing the suspension order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 395, Sec. 4.   Effective August 11, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

16371.

The suspension shall remain in effect, and no license shall be issued to the judgment debtor until the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430), and until either the judgment is satisfied in full or to the extent provided in this chapter, subject to the exemption provided in Section 16375.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

16373.

(a) The clerk of a court shall, subject to subdivision (b), issue upon the request of a judgment creditor a certified copy of any judgment or a certified copy of the register of actions in an action resulting in a judgment for damages, and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment on a form provided by the department.

(b) The judgment creditor may pay the required fees and request the documents specified in subdivision (a) upon the expiration of 30 days after the judgment has become final, if the judgment has not been stayed or satisfied within the amounts specified in this chapter as shown by the records of the court. The court shall determine the required fees, which shall be commensurate with the cost incurred by the court in carrying out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16374.
